ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев: Наборы мебели для детей и младенцев; Аксессуары для колыбелей и люлек; Колыбели и люльки; Пеленальные столики; Аксессуары для кроватей для детей и младенцев; Кровати для детей и младенцев; Аксессуары для высоких стульчиков и сидений-бустеров; Высокие стульчики и сиденья-бустеры; Комплекты детских столов и стульев; Обучающие башни и табуреты-стремянки; Бескаркасные игровые диваны; Детские табуреты-подставки; Детские стулья и кресла
de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel: Möbelgarnituren für Babies & Kleinkinder; Wiegen- & Stubenwagenzubehör; Wiegen & Stubenwagen; Wickeltische; Gitter- & Kinderbettzubehör; Gitterbetten & Kleinkinderbetten; Zubehör für Hochstühle und Sitzerhöhungen; Hochstühle & Sitzerhöhungen; Kindertisch- & Stuhlsets; Lerntürme & Küchenhelfer-Hocker; Spielsofas; Tritthocker & Kindertreppen; Kleinkinderstühle & -sessel
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams: Baldų komplektai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams; Lopšių ir lovyčių kūdikiams priedai; Lopšiai ir lovytės kūdikiams; Vystymo stalai; Supamųjų lovyčių ir lovyčių mažiems vaikams priedai; Supamosios lovytės ir lovytės mažiems vaikams; Aukštų kėdučių ir sėdynių pagalvėlių priedai; Aukštos kėdutės ir sėdynių pagalvėlės; Vaikiški stalų ir kėdžių komplektai; Mokomieji bokšteliai ir pagalbinės virtuvės kėdutės; Žaidimo sofos; Laipteliai ir paaukštintos kėdės; Mažylių kėdutės ir foteliai
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具: 婴幼儿家具套装; 摇篮车/摇篮配件; 摇篮车/摇篮; 换尿布台; 婴儿床/儿童床配件; 婴儿床/儿童床; 儿童餐椅与汽车座椅配件; 儿童餐椅/餐椅垫; 儿童桌椅套装; 学习塔和厨房辅助凳; 游戏沙发; 脚踏凳和增高凳; 幼儿椅和扶手椅
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança: Conjuntos de mobiliário de bebé e criança; Acessórios para berços e alcofas; Berços e alcofas; Mesas muda-fraldas; Acessórios para berço e cama de bebé; Berços e camas de criança; Acessórios para bancos elevatórios e cadeiras de refeição; Assentos para bancos elevatórios e cadeiras de refeição; Conjuntos de mesas e cadeiras para crianças; Torres de aprendizagem e bancos auxiliares de cozinha; Sofás para crianças; Bancos e escadotes infantis; Cadeiras e cadeirões para crianças pequenas
ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구: 영유아 가구 세트; 요람/아기 침대 부대용품; 요람/아기 침대; 기저귀 교체대; 영유아용 침대 부대용품; 영유아용 침대; 유아용 식탁 의자/보조 의자 부대용품; 유아용 식탁 의자/보조 의자; 유아용 테이블 및 의자 세트; 러닝 타워 및 키친 헬퍼 스툴; 소파 플레이; 스텝 스툴 및 부스터 스툴; 유아용 의자 및 암체어
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok: Súpravy detského nábytku; Príslušenstvo ku detským košíkom a kolískam; Detské košíky a kolísky; Prebaľovacie stolíky; Príslušenstvo do detských postieľok; Detské postieľky; Príslušenstvo pre vysoké stoličky a podsedáky; Vysoké stoličky a podsedáky; Detské stoly a stoličky; Učiace veže a kuchynské stoličky pre pomocníkov; Hracie pohovky; Schodíky a podsedáky; Detské stoličky a kreslá
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具: ベビー用家具セット; バシネット・ゆりかご用品; バシネット・ゆりかご; おむつ交換台; ベビーベッド関連用品; ベビーベッド; ハイチェア・ベビーチェア用品; ハイチェア・ベビーチェア; キッズ用テーブル・チェアセット; ラーニングタワー・キッチンヘルパースツール; プレイソファ; 踏み台・ブースタースツール; 幼児用チェア・アームチェア
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici: Seturi de mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici; Accesorii pentru pătuț și leagăn; Pătuțuri și leagăne; Mese de înfășat; Accesorii pentru leagăn/pătuț pentru copii; Pătuțuri și paturi pentru copii mici; Accesorii pentru scaune înalte și scaune de ridicare; Scaune înalte și scaune de ridicare; Seturi de mese și scaune pentru copii; Turnuri de învățare și trepte de ajutor în bucătărie; Canapele de joacă; Trepte și scăunele înălțătoare; Scaune și fotolii pentru copii mici
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn: Møbelsett for baby og barn; Tilbehør til babysenger og vugger; Babysenger og vugger; Stellebord; Tilbehør for vugger og barnesenger; Vugger og barnesenger; Tilbehør til barnestoler og barneseter; Barnestoler og barneseter; Bord og stoler for barn; Læringstårn og kjøkkenkrakker for barn; Lekesofaer; Trappekrakker og forhøyere; Barnestoler og lenestoler
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilya Takımları; Sepet Beşik ve Beşik Aksesuarları; Sepet Beşikler ve Beşikler; Bebek Alt Değiştirme Masaları; Bebek Karyolası ve Küçük Çocuk Yatağı Aksesuarları; Bebek Karyolaları ve Küçük Çocuk Yatakları; Mama Sandalyesi ve Koltuk Yükseltici Aksesuarları; Mama Sandalyeleri ve Yükselen Koltuklar; Çocuk masa ve sandalye setleri; Öğrenme kuleleri ve mutfak basamakları; Çocuk Oyun Koltukları; Basamaklı tabureler ve yükselticiler; Çocuk sandalye ve koltukları
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês: Conjuntos de móveis infantis; Acessórios para berços e moisés; Berços e moisés; Trocadores; Acessórios para berço e cama infantil; Berços e camas infantis; Acessórios para cadeiras de refeição; Cadeirões e assentos elevatórios; Conjuntos de mesas e cadeiras infantis; Torres de aprendizagem e banquinhos auxiliares de cozinha; Sofá para brincar; Banquetas e degraus infantis; Cadeiras e poltronas para crianças
hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu: Kompleti namještaja za bebe i malu djecu; Dodaci za krevetiće i kolijevke; Kolijevke i njihaljke; Stolovi za presvlačenje; Dodaci za dječje krevete i krevetiće; Krevetići i kreveti za malu djecu; Dodaci za hranilice i pomoćne sjedalice; Hranilice i pomoćne sjedalice; Dječji stolovi i kompleti stolica; Tornjevi za učenje i pomoćne kuhinjske stolice; Sofe za igru; Stepenice i pomoćne stolice; Dječje stolice i fotelje
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ: Bộ đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ; Phụ kiện nôi và cũi em bé; Nôi trẻ em; Bàn thay tã bỉm; Phụ kiện giường cũi em bé; Cũi và giường cho trẻ; Phụ kiện ghế ngồi ăn và ghế nâng cho trẻ em; Ghế ngồi ăn và nghế nâng; Bộ bàn ghế trẻ em; Tháp học tập & ghế phụ bếp cho bé; Ghế sofa chơi trò chơi; Ghế bước & ghế đôn tăng chiều cao; Ghế thường & ghế bành cho trẻ nhỏ
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα: Σετ βρεφικών & παιδικών επίπλων; Αξεσουάρ για λίκνα & κούνιες; Λίκνα & κούνιες; Τραπέζια αλλαγής; Αξεσουάρ για κούνιες & παιδικά κρεβάτια; Κούνιες & παιδικά κρεβάτια; Αξεσουάρ καρεκλών φαγητού & ενισχυτικών καθισμάτων; Καρέκλες φαγητού & ενισχυτικά καθίσματα; Σετ παιδικών τραπεζιών και καρεκλών; Πύργοι εκμάθησης και παιδικά σκαμπό κουζίνας; Καναπέδες παιχνιδιού; Σκαλοπατάκια και σκαμπό ανύψωσης; Παιδικές καρέκλες και πολυθρόνες
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits: Meubles pour bébés et tout-petits; Accessoires pour couffins et berceaux; Couffins et berceaux; Tables à langer; Accessoires pour lits de bébé et d’enfant; Lits de bébé; Accessoires pour chaises hautes et réhausseurs; Chaises hautes et réhausseurs; Ensembles tables et chaises pour enfants; Tours d’apprentissage et marchepieds de cuisine; Canapés de jeu; Marchepieds et rehausseurs; Chaises et fauteuils pour tout-petits
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence: Sada nábytku pro miminka a batolata; Dětské koše a kolébky – příslušenství; Dětské koše a kolébky; Přebalovací stoly; Dětské postýlky – příslušenství; Ohrádky a dětské postýlky; Dětské židle a sedačky – příslušenství; Dětské židličky a sedačky; Dětské stolky se židlemi; Učící věže a kuchyňské stoličky; Hrací pohovky; Stupátka a podnožky; Křesílka a židle pro batolata
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก: ชุดเฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก; อุปกรณ์เปลเด็ก; ที่นอนเด็กอ่อนชนิดเข็นได้และที่นอนเด็กอ่อนชนิดโยกได้; โต๊ะเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม; อุปกรณ์เตียงเด็กเล็ก; ที่นอนเด็กเล็ก; เก้าอี้เด็กและเก้าอี้หัดทานข้าว; เก้าอี้ขายาวสำหรับเด็กเล็กและบูสเตอร์ซีท; ชุดโต๊ะและเก้าอี้เด็ก; เก้าอี้ส่งเสริมพัฒนาการและเก้าอี้บันไดในครัว; โซฟาสำหรับนั่งเล่น; เก้าอี้บันไดและบันไดเหยียบ; เก้าอี้และอาร์มแชร์เด็ก
zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具: 嬰幼兒家具組; 嬰兒睡藍/搖籃配件; 嬰兒睡籃/搖籃; 換尿布桌; 嬰幼兒床配件; 嬰兒床; 高腳椅/輔助餐椅配件; 高腳椅和輔助椅; 兒童桌椅組; 學習塔與廚房輔助踏凳; 遊戲沙發; 墊高椅與增高凳; 幼兒椅與扶手椅
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut: Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalusetit; Vauvansänkyjen ja kehtojen lisätarvikkeet; Vauvansängyt ja kehdot; Vaipanvaihtopöydät; Pinnasänkyjen ja lastensänkyjen lisätarvikkeet; Pinnasängyt ja lastensängyt; Syöttötuolien ja istuinkorokkeiden lisätarvikkeet; Syöttötuolit ja istuinkorokkeet; Lasten pöytä- ja tuolisetit; Oppimistornit ja apujakkarat; Leikkisohvat; Korokkeet ja porrasjakkarat; Taaperoiden tuolit ja nojatuolit
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture: Baby & Toddler Furniture Sets; Bassinet & Cradle Accessories; Bassinets & Cradles; Changing Tables; Crib & Toddler Bed Accessories; Cribs & Toddler Beds; High Chair & Booster Seat Accessories; High Chairs & Booster Seats; Kids Tables & Chair Sets; Learning Towers & Kitchen Helper Stools; Play Sofas; Step Stools & Booster Stools; Toddler Chairs & Armchairs
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn: Møbelsæt til baby og småbørn; Kurvevugge og vugge – tilbehør; Kurvevugger og vugger; Pusleborde; Tremmesenge og børnesenge – tilbehør; Tremmesenge og børnesenge; Høje stole og børnesæder – tilbehør; Højstole og børnesæder; Sæt med børnebord og -stole; Læringstårne og køkkenhjælper-skamler; Legesofaer; Trappeskamler og forhøjerskamler; Småbørnsstole og -lænestole
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца: Комплекти мебели за бебета и малки деца; Аксесоари за кошари и люлки; Кошари и люлки; Маси за повиване; Аксесоари за бебешки легла и креватчета за малки деца; Бебешки легла и легла за малки деца; Аксесоари за високи столчета и бустерни седалки; Високи столчета и бустерни седалки; Детски комплекти маси и столове; Платформи за обучение и кухненски помощни столове; Дивани за игра; Стъпала и повдигащи столчета; Детски столчета и кресла
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt: Zestawy mebli dla dzieci i niemowląt; Akcesoria do koszyków i kołysek; Koszyki i kołyski; Przewijaki; Akcesoria do łóżeczek i łóżek dziecinnych; Łóżeczka i łóżka dziecinne; Akcesoria do wysokich krzeseł i fotelików samochodowych; Krzesełka do karmienia i siedziska na krzesła; Stoliki i krzesełka dziecięce; Wieże edukacyjne (kitchen helpers); Sofy do zabawy; Podnóżki i stołki-podwyższenia; Krzesełka i fotele dla maluchów
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños: Conjuntos de mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños; Accesorios para moisés y cunas; Cunas y moisés; Cambiadores; Accesorios para cunas y camas para niños; Cunas y camas para niños; Accesorios para tronas y alzadores; Tronas y alzadores; Sets de mesas y sillas infantiles; Torres de aprendizaje y taburetes de ayuda para la cocina; Sofá para juegos; Taburetes escalón y taburetes elevadores; Sillas y sillones para niños pequeños
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok: Baba- és csecsemőkészletek; Mélykosár és bölcsőkiegészítők; Mélykosarak és bölcsők; Pelenkázóasztalok; Kiságy- és csecsemőágy-kiegészítők; Kiságyak és csecsemőágyak; Etetőszék- és ülésmagasító-kiegészítők; Etetőszékek és ülésmagasítók; Gyerekasztal- és székkészletek; Tanulótornyok és konyhai fellépők; Játékkanapék; Fellépők és ülésmagasítók; Gyerekszékek és -fotelek
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke: Pohištveni kompleti za dojenčke in malčke; Dodatki za košarice in zibelke; Košarice in zibelke; Previjalne mize; Dodatki za posteljice in otroške posteljice; Otroške posteljice in posteljice za malčke; Dodatki za stolčke za hranjenje in blazine za stolček; Stolčki za hranjenje in blazine za stolček; Kompleti otroških miz in stolov; Učni stolpi in kuhinjski stoli za pomoč; Otroške zofe; Stopničasti stolčki in dvižni stolčki; Otroški stoli in naslanjači
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn: Möbelpaket för bebisar och småbarn; Tillbehör till babykorgar och vaggor; Babykorgar och vaggor; Skötbord; Tillbehör till spjälsängar och barnsängar; Spjälsängar och barnsängar; Tillbehör till barnstolar och sittdynor; Barnstolar och sittdynor; Barnbord & stolsset; Lärotorn & hjälpa till-pallar; Leksoffor; Pallar & stegpallar; Småbarnsstolar & fåtöljer
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi: Set di mobili per bebè e bimbi; Accessori per culle e culle neonati; Culle e culle per neonati; Fasciatoi; Accessori per lettini bambino; Lettini e letti per bimbi; Accessori per seggioloni e rialzi per sedie; Seggioloni e seggiolini; Set tavoli e sedie per bambini; Torri montessoriane e sgabelli da cucina; Divano da gioco; Sgabelli a gradino e rialzi; Sedie e poltroncine per bimbi
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters: Meubelsets voor baby's en peuters; Accessoires voor babybedjes en wiegjes; Babybedjes en wiegjes; Commodes; Accessoires voor peuter- en kinderbedjes; Peuter- en kinderbedjes; Accessoires voor kinderstoelen en stoelverhogers; Kinderstoelen en stoelverhogers; Kindertafels en stoelensets; Leertorens en keukenkrukjes; Speelbank; Opstapjes en krukjes; Peuterstoelen en -fauteuils